Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 1. The Board of Pharmacy.

Administrative Code. —

For board of pharmacy, see 12 AAC 52.

Sec. 08.80.003.
Practice of pharmacy as a profession.

The practice of pharmacy is declared to be a professional practice affecting the public health, safety, and welfare and is subject to regulation and control in the public interest. It is further declared to be a matter of public interest that only qualified persons be permitted to engage in the practice of pharmacy, and to ensure the quality of drugs and related devices distributed in the state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 45 SLA 1996)

Sec. 08.80.005.
Statement of purpose.

It is the purpose of this chapter to promote, preserve, and protect the public health, safety, and welfare by and through the effective control and regulation of the practice of pharmacy.

History.

(§ 2 ch 45 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, registration, and permit requirements, see 12 AAC 52, art. 1.

For personnel, see 12 AAC 52, art. 2.

For license renewal and continuing education requirements, see 12 AAC 52, art. 3.

For guidelines for pharmacies and pharmacists, see 12 AAC 52, art. 4.

For pharmacy practice standards, see 12 AAC 52, art. 5.

For wholesale drug distributors and facilities, see 12 AAC 52, art. 6.

For institutional pharmacies, see 12 AAC 52, art. 7.

For drug rooms and facilities without a pharmacy, see 12 AAC 52, art. 8.

For disciplinary guidelines, see 12 AAC 52, art. 9.

Sec. 08.80.010.
Creation and membership of board; officers.

There is created the Board of Pharmacy, composed of seven members, five of whom shall be pharmacists licensed in the state who have been actively engaged in the practice of pharmacy in the state for a period of three years immediately preceding their appointment. Two shall be persons with no direct financial interest in the health care industry. Whenever possible, the board shall include at least one member from each judicial district.

An officer elected by the board serves a term of one year and may not serve more than four consecutive full terms in a specific office.

History.

(§ 3 ch 194 SLA 1955; am § 25 ch 102 SLA 1976; am § 3 ch 45 SLA 1996)

Sec. 08.80.020.
Term of office. [Repealed, § 20 ch 80 SLA 1996. For current provisions, see AS 39.05.053.]

Sec. 08.80.030.
Powers and duties of the board.

The board is responsible for the control and regulation of the practice of pharmacy.

In order to fulfill its responsibilities, the board has the powers necessary for implementation and enforcement of this chapter, including the power to

elect a president and secretary from its membership and adopt rules for the conduct of its business;

license by examination or by license transfer the applicants who are qualified to engage in the practice of pharmacy;

assist the department in inspections and investigations for violations of this chapter, or of any other state or federal statute relating to the practice of pharmacy;

adopt regulations to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

establish and enforce compliance with professional standards and rules of conduct for pharmacists engaged in the practice of pharmacy;

determine standards for recognition and approval of degree programs of schools and colleges of pharmacy whose graduates shall be eligible for licensure in this state, including the specification and enforcement of requirements for practical training, including internships;

establish for pharmacists and pharmacies minimum specifications for the physical facilities, technical equipment, personnel, and procedures for the storage, compounding, and dispensing of drugs or related devices, and for the monitoring of drug therapy;

enforce the provisions of this chapter relating to the conduct or competence of pharmacists practicing in the state, and the suspension, revocation, or restriction of licenses to engage in the practice of pharmacy;

license and regulate the training, qualifications, and employment of pharmacy interns and pharmacy technicians;

issue licenses to persons engaged in the manufacture and distribution of drugs and related devices;

establish and maintain a controlled substance prescription database as provided in AS

17.30.200

;

establish standards for the independent administration by a pharmacist of vaccines and related emergency medications under AS

08.80.168

, including the completion of an immunization training program approved by the board;

establish standards for the independent dispensing by a pharmacist of an opioid overdose drug under AS

17.20.085

, including the completion of an opioid overdose training program approved by the board;

require that a licensed pharmacist register with the controlled substance prescription database under AS

17.30.200

(n);

establish the qualifications and duties of the executive administrator and delegate authority to the executive administrator that is necessary to conduct board business;

license and inspect the facilities of wholesale drug distributors, third-party logistics providers, and outsourcing facilities located outside the state under AS

08.80.159

.

The board shall post and maintain a link to the United States Food and Drug Administration’s list of all currently approved interchangeable biological products on the board’s Internet website.

The minimum specifications for facilities, equipment, personnel, and procedures for the compounding, storage, and dispensing of drugs established under (b)(7) of this section must be consistent with the requirements of secs. 201 — 208, P.L. 113-54 (Drug Supply Chain Security Act).

History.

(§ 4 ch 194 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 72 SLA 1969; am § 9 ch 69 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 206 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 187 SLA 1976; am §§ 4, 21 ch 166 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 146 SLA 1986; am § 18 ch 9 SLA 1994; am § 4 ch 45 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 84 SLA 2008; am § 1 ch 16 SLA 2015; am § 1 ch 2 SLA 2016; am § 12 ch 25 SLA 2016; am § 29 ch 2 SSSLA 2017; am § 1 ch 58 SLA 2018; am § 1 ch 66 SLA 2018; am §§ 2, 3 ch 66 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Paragraph (b)(14) was enacted as (b)(13); renumbered in 2017.

Subsection (d) was enacted as (c); relettered in 2018.

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, registration, and permit requirements, see 12 AAC 52, art. 1.

For personnel, see 12 AAC 52, art. 2.

For license renewal and continuing education requirements, see 12 AAC 52, art. 3.

For guidelines for pharmacies and pharmacists, see 12 AAC 52, art. 4.

For pharmacy practice standards, see 12 AAC 52, art. 5.

For wholesale drug distributors and facilities, see 12 AAC 52, art. 6.

For institutional pharmacies, see 12 AAC 52, art. 7.

For drug rooms and facilities without a pharmacy, see 12 AAC 52, art. 8.

For disciplinary guidelines, see 12 AAC 52, art. 9.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective August 9, 2015, added (b)(12), and made a related change.

The first 2016 amendment, effective March 15, 2016, added (b)(13).

The second 2016 amendment, effective July 17, 2016, added (b)(13) [now (b)(14)].

The 2017 amendment, in (b)(14), deleted "who has a federal drug enforcement administration registration number". Although the 2017 amendment was to have taken effect July 17, 2017, under § 51, ch. 2, SSSLA 2017, the governor did not sign the bill until July 25, 2017, and so under AS

01.10.070(d)

the actual effective date of the 2017 amendment was July 26, 2017.

The 2018 amendment, effective July 25, 2018, added (b)(15), and made a related change.

The 2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2019, added (b)(16) and (d), and made a related change.

Editor's notes. —

The delayed repeal of paragraph (b)(13) [now (b)(14)] of this section by sec. 52,
ch. 25, SLA 2016, which was to take effect July 1, 2021, was repealed by sec. 47,
ch. 2, SSSLA 2017.

Sec. 08.80.040.
Duties of the board. [Repealed, § 28 ch 45 SLA 1996.]

Sec. 08.80.045.
Nonprescription drugs.

Except as provided in (b) of this section the board may not regulate the sale of patent or nonprescription drugs that are prepackaged for use by the consumer, are in their original, unbroken packaging, and are labeled in accordance with requirements of the federal government.

The board may regulate the sale and distribution of patent or nonprescription drugs under AS

44.62.250

when the regulation is required by an emergency to protect the public health and safety.

History.

(§ 7 ch 166 SLA 1980)

Sec. 08.80.050.
Applicability of Administrative Procedure Act.

The board shall comply with AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 2 (ch 2) ch 143 SLA 1959)

Sec. 08.80.060.
Meetings of the board.

The board shall meet at least three times each year at the call of the president for the transaction of business properly before it. The president shall also call the board into session when requested in writing by at least two members. Meetings may be held telephonically.

History.

(§ 6 ch 194 SLA 1955; am § 5 ch 45 SLA 1996)

Sec. 08.80.070.
Quorum.

Four members constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. However, when the board meets for the purpose of examining applications for licensure, three members of the board constitute a quorum.

History.

(§ 6 ch 194 SLA 1955; am § 27 ch 102 SLA 1976; am § 6 ch 45 SLA 1996)

Sec. 08.80.080.
Expenses of members.

Members of the board are entitled to reimbursement for actual travel expenses incidental to the discharge of their duties and, while in the performance of their duties, are entitled to the per diem expenses allowed by law.

History.

(§ 7 ch 194 SLA 1955)

Cross references. —

For per diem and travel expenses, see AS

39.20.180

.

Sec. 08.80.090.
Disposition of fees. [Repealed, § 54 ch 37 SLA 1985.]

Sec. 08.80.100.
Board secretary as certifying officer. [Repealed, § 3 ch 59 SLA 1966.]

Sec. 08.80.105.
Removal of board members.

A member of the board may be removed from office by the governor for cause.

History.

(§ 8 ch 166 SLA 1980; am § 5 ch 30 SLA 1992)

Cross references. —

For other grounds for removal, see AS

08.01.020

.